Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB708.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 32 OF KRS CHAPTER
154 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The authority is hereby authorized to negotiate and execute a tax incentive
agreement pursuant to this subchapter based on the tiering system provided in
Section 5 of this Act. Project tax credit amounts may be:
(a) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per new job created in Tier I
counties;
(b) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) per new job created in Tier II counties;
(c) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per new job created in Tier III counties;
and
(d) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per new job created in Tier IV counties.
(2) If an eligible company establishes or expands its headquarters in Kentucky and
creates at least forty (40) new jobs, the eligible company may receive a tax credit
equal to twenty percent (20%) of the value of the facility dedicated to the
headquarters operations for up to ten (10) years.
(3) Eligible companies may choose the taxable year to claim the tax credit negotiated
under this subchapter. The credit shall not be claimed on a return filed for a
previous taxable year.
(4) (a) The tax incentive agreement established pursuant to this subchapter shall
indicate the taxable year in which the credit shall be claimed.
(b) The authority shall report the credit amount and taxable year for which the
credit may be claimed.
(c) The taxable year for when the credit shall be claimed shall not exceed more
than four (4) taxable years after the date of final approval.
Section 2. KRS 154.32-010 is amended to read as follows:
Page 1 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(1) "Activation date" means the date established in the tax incentive agreement that is
within two (2) years of final approval;
(2) "Affiliate" means the following:
(a) Members of a family, including only brothers and sisters of the whole or half
blood, spouse, ancestors, and lineal descendants of an individual;
(b) An individual, and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the
outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for that
individual;
(c) An individual, and a limited liability company of which more than fifty
percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits are owned or controlled,
directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;
(d) Two (2) corporations which are members of the same controlled group, which
includes and is limited to:
1. One (1) or more chains of corporations connected through stock
ownership with a common parent corporation if:
a. Stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total
combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or
more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all
classes of stock of each of the corporations, except the common
parent corporation, is owned by one (1) or more of the other
corporations; and
b. The common parent corporation owns stock possessing more than
fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all
classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of
the total value of shares of all classes of stock of at least one (1) of
the other corporations, excluding, in computing the voting power
or value, stock owned directly by the other corporations; or
Page 2 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
2. Two (2) or more corporations if five (5) or fewer persons who are
individuals, estates, or trusts own stock possessing more than fifty
percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock
entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of
shares of all classes of stock of each corporation, taking into account the
stock ownership of each person only to the extent the stock ownership is
identical with respect to each corporation;
(e) A grantor and a fiduciary of any trust;
(f) A fiduciary of a trust and a fiduciary of another trust, if the same person is a
grantor of both trusts;
(g) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of that trust;
(h) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of another trust, if the same person is a
grantor of both trusts;
(i) A fiduciary of a trust and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value
of the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for the
trust or by or for a person who is a grantor of the trust;
(j) A fiduciary of a trust and a limited liability company more than fifty percent
(50%) of the capital interest, or the interest in profits, of which is owned
directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for a person who is a grantor
of the trust;
(k) A corporation, a partnership, or a limited partnership if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the
corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest, or the profits
interest, in the partnership or limited partnership;
(l) A corporation and a limited liability company if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the
Page 3 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the
limited liability company;
(m) A partnership or limited partnership and a limited liability company if the
same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits in the
partnership or limited partnership; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the
limited liability company;
(n) An S corporation and another S corporation if the same persons own more
than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of each corporation;
S corporation designation being the same as that designation under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(o) An S corporation and a C corporation, if the same persons own more than
fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S
and C corporation designations being the same as those designations under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or
(p) Two (2) or more limited liability companies, if the same persons own more
than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or are entitled to more than fifty
percent (50%) of the capital profits in the limited liability companies;
(3) "Agribusiness" means the processing of raw agricultural products, including but not
limited to timber and industrial hemp, or the performance of value-added functions
with regard to raw agricultural products;
(4) "Alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces
alternative transportation fuels for sale. The alternative fuel production may
produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function of the operations remains
the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;
Page 4 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(5) "Alternative transportation fuels" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(6) "Approved company" means an eligible company that has received final approval
to receive incentives under this subchapter;
(7) "Approved costs" means the amount of eligible costs approved by the authority at
final approval;
(8) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority
established by KRS 154.20-010;
(9) "Biomass resources" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(10) "Capital lease" means a lease classified as a capital lease by the Statement of
Financial Accounting Standards No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the
Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976, as amended;
(11) "Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline" means the in-state portion of a
pipeline, including appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is
used exclusively for the purpose of transporting carbon dioxide or hydrogen to the
point of sale, storage, or other carbon or hydrogen management applications;
(12) "Coal severing and processing" means activities resulting in the eligible company
being subject to the tax imposed by KRS Chapter 143;
(13) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(14) "Confirmed approved costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects, the documented eligible costs
incurred on or before the activation date; or
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. The documented eligible costs incurred on or before the activation date;
and
2. Estimated rent to be incurred by the approved company throughout the
term of the tax incentive agreement.
For both owned and leased economic development projects, "confirmed approved
Page 5 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
costs" may be less than approved costs, but shall not be more than approved costs;
(15) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(16) "Economic development project" means:
(a) The acquisition, leasing, or construction of a new facility;
(b) The acquisition, leasing, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing facility; or
(c) The installation and equipping of a facility;
by an eligible company. "Economic development project" does not include any
economic development project that will result in the replacement of facilities
existing in the Commonwealth, except as provided in KRS 154.32-060;
(17) (a) "Eligible company" means any corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any
other entity with a proposed economic development project that is engaged in
or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities
within the Commonwealth:
1. Manufacturing;
2. Agribusiness;
3. Nonretail service or technology;
4. Headquarters operations, regardless of the underlying business activity
of the company;
5. Alternative fuel, gasification, energy-efficient alternative fuel, or
renewable energy production;
6. Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline;
7. Coal severing and processing; or
8. Hospital operations.
(b) "Eligible company" does not include companies where the primary activity to
be conducted within the Commonwealth is forestry, fishing, the provision of
utilities, construction, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate, rental and
Page 6 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, or public
administration services;
(18) "Eligible costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Nonrecurring obligations incurred for labor and nonrecurring payments
to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in connection
with the economic development project;
3. The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental
thereto, including recording fees;
4. The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be
required or necessary for completion of an economic development
project which is not paid by a contractor or otherwise provided for;
5. All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test
borings, surveys, estimated plans and specifications, preliminary
investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as for the
performance of all the duties required for construction of the economic
development project;
6. All costs which are required to be paid under the terms of any contract
for the economic development project;
7. All costs incurred for construction activities, including site tests and
inspections; subsurface site work; excavation; removal of structures,
roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions; filling, grading,
and providing drainage and storm water retention; installation of utilities
such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electric, communications,
and similar facilities; off-site construction of utility extensions to the
boundaries of the real estate; construction and installation of railroad
Page 7 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
spurs as needed to connect the economic development project to existing
railways; or similar activities as the authority may determine necessary
for construction of the economic development project; and
8. All other costs of a nature comparable to those described above; and
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Building/leasehold improvements; and
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the estimated annual rent for each year of the tax
incentive agreement.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, for economic development
projects that are not in enhanced incentive counties, the cost of equipment eligible
for recovery as an eligible cost shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)
for each new full-time job created as of the activation date;
(19) "Employee benefits" means payments by an approved company for its full-time
employees for health insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance,
defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;
(20) "Energy-efficient alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that
produces for sale energy-efficient alternative fuels;
(21) "Energy-efficient alternative fuels" means homogeneous fuels that:
(a) Are produced from processes designed to densify feedstock coal, waste coal,
or biomass resources; and
(b) Have an energy content that is greater than the feedstock coal, waste coal, or
biomass resource;
(22) "Enhanced incentive counties" means counties certified as Tier III or Tier IV by
the authority pursuant to KRS 154.32-050;
(23) "Final approval" means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible
company to receive incentives under this subchapter;
Page 8 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(24) (a) "Full-time job" means a job held by a person who:
1. Is required to work a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week; and
2. a. Is subject to the Kentucky individual income tax imposed by KRS
141.020; or
b. Works remotely away from the economic development project if
the job meets all of the following conditions:
i. Is held by a Kentucky resident;
ii. Was created as a result of the economic development project;
and
iii. The payroll of this job is expensed to the economic
development project.
(b) "Full-time job" does not include a job held by a resident of any state with a
reciprocal agreement between the Commonwealth and the other state as
described in KRS 141.070;
(25) "Gasification process" means a process that converts any carbon-containing
material into a synthesis gas composed primarily of carbon monoxide and
hydrogen;
(26) "Gasification production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces for
sale:
(a) Alternative transportation fuels;
(b) Synthetic natural gas;
(c) Chemicals;
(d) Chemical feedstocks; or
(e) Liquid fuels;
from coal, waste coal, coal-processing waste, or biomass resources, through a
gasification process. The gasification production may produce electricity as a by-
product if the primary function of the operations remains the production and sale of
Page 9 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
alternative transportation fuels, synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical
feedstocks, or liquid fuels;
(27) "Headquarters" means the principal office where the principal executives of the
entity are located and from which other personnel, branches, affiliates, offices, or
entities are controlled;
(28) "Hospital" means a facility licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
under KRS Chapter 216B for the operation of a hospital and the basic services
provided by a hospital;
(29) "Incentives" means the incentives available under this subchapter, as listed in KRS
154.32-020(3);
(30) "Job target" means the annual average number of new full-time jobs that the
approved company commits to create and maintain at the economic development
project, which shall not be less than ten (10) new full-time jobs in Tier I and Tier
II counties or five (5) new full-time jobs in Tier III and Tier IV counties;
(31) "Kentucky gross receipts" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(32) "Kentucky gross profits" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(33) "Lease agreement" means an agreement between an approved company and an
unrelated entity conveying the right to use a facility, the terms of which reflect an
arms' length transaction. "Lease agreement" does not include a capital lease;
(34) "Leased project" means an economic development project site occupied by an
approved company pursuant to a lease agreement;
(35) "Manufacturing" means any activity involving:
(a) Processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the
processing resulting in a change in the conditions of the property and any
activity related to the processing, assembling, or production of property,
together with the storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office
facilities; or
Page 10 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(b) Production of vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment
necessary to produce personal protective equipment;
(36) (a) "Nonretail service or technology" means any activity where service or
technology is provided predominantly outside the Commonwealth and
designed to serve a multistate, national, or international market.
(b) "Nonretail service or technology" includes but is not limited to call centers,
centralized administrative or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales
order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment centers, data processing
centers, research and development facilities, and other similar activities;
(37) "Owned project" means an economic development project owned in fee simple by
the approved company or an affiliate, or possessed by the approved company or an
affiliate pursuant to a capital lease;
(38) "Personal protective equipment" means protective clothing, helmets, gloves, face
shields, goggles, face masks, respirators, and other equipment designed to protect
the user from injury or the spread of infection or illness;
(39) "Preliminary approval" means the action taken by the authority preliminarily
approving an eligible company for incentives under this subchapter;
(40) "Renewable energy production" means a Kentucky operation that utilizes wind
power, biomass resources, landfill methane gas, hydropower, solar power, or other
similar renewable resources to generate electricity for sale to unrelated entities;
(41) "Rent" means the actual annual rent or fee paid by an approved company under a
lease agreement;
(42) "Start-up costs" means nonrecurring costs incurred to furnish and equip a facility
for an economic development project, including costs incurred for:
(a) Computers, furnishings, office equipment, manufacturing equipment, and
fixtures;
(b) The relocation of out-of-state equipment; and
Page 11 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(c) Cost of fixed telecommunications equipment;
as certified to the authority in accordance with KRS 154.32-030;
(43) "Synthetic natural gas" means the same thing as in KRS 152.715;
(44) "Tax incentive agreement" means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS
154.32-040 between the authority and an approved company;
(45) "Term" means the period of time for which a tax incentive agreement may be in
effect, which shall not exceed fifteen (15) years for an economic development
project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10) years for an economic
development project located in a Tier I or Tier II county[not located in any other
county];
(46) "Tier" means the sorting of all Kentucky counties into quartiles based on each
county's unemployment rate and population ranking pursuant to Section 5 of this
Act;
(47)[(46)] "Vital medications" means any drug or biologic used to prevent or treat a
serious life-threatening disease or medical condition for which there is no other
available source with sufficient supply of that drug or biologic or alternative drug or
biologic;
(48)[(47)] "Wage" means the per hour earnings of a full-time employee, including
wages, tips, overtime, bonuses, and commissions, as reflected on the employee's
federal form W-2 wage and tax statement, but excludes employee benefits; and
(49)[(48)] "Wage target" means the average total hourly compensation amount,
including the minimum wage and employee benefits, that the approved company
commits to meet for all new full-time jobs created and maintained as a result of the
economic development project, which shall not be less than:
(a) One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in
enhanced incentive counties; or
(b) One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in all other
Page 12 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
counties.
Section 3. KRS 154.32-020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purposes of this subchapter are:
(a) To provide incentives for eligible companies and to encourage the location or
expansion of manufacturing facilities, agribusiness operations, nonretail
service or technology facilities, headquarters operations, alternative fuel
production facilities, gasification production facilities, energy-efficient
alternative fuel production facilities, renewable energy production facilities,
carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipelines, coal severing and
processing, and hospital operations in the Commonwealth to advance the
public purposes of:
1. Creation of new jobs that, but for the incentives offered by the authority,
would not exist within the Commonwealth;
2. Creation of new sources of tax revenues for the support of public
services provided by the Commonwealth;
3. Improvement in the quality of life for Kentucky citizens through the
creation of sustainable jobs with higher salaries; and
4. Providing an economic stimulus to bolster in-state production of vital
medications and personal protective equipment; and
(b) To provide a tiered system of[enhanced] incentives for companies [that locate
in enhanced incentive counties ]in recognition of the depressed economic
conditions in certain[those] counties and the increased need for the growth
and development caused by the depressed economic conditions.
(2) To qualify for the incentives provided by subsection (3) of this section, an approved
company shall:
(a) Incur eligible costs of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);
(b) 1. Create at least ten (10) new full-time jobs and maintain an annual
Page 13 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
average number of at least ten (10) new full-time jobs in Tier I or Tier
II counties; or
2. Create at least five (5) new full-time jobs and maintain an annual
average number of at least five (5) new full-time jobs in enhanced
incentive counties; and
(c) 1. Pay at least ninety percent (90%) of all new full-time employees whose
jobs were created as a result of the economic development project a
minimum wage of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of
the federal minimum wage in enhanced incentive counties, and one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in Tier I or
Tier II[other] counties throughout the term of the economic
development project; and
2. Provide employee benefits for all new full-time jobs equal to at least
fifteen percent (15%) of the minimum wage requirement established by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph. If the eligible company does not
provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the
minimum wage requirement established by subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, the eligible company may still qualify for incentives if it
provides the full-time employees hired as a result of the economic
development project total hourly compensation equal to or greater than
one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the minimum wage requirement
established in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph through increased
hourly wages combined with employee benefits; or
(d) Produce vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment
necessary to produce personal protective equipment.
(3) The incentives available under this subchapter are as follows:
(a) Tax credits of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky income tax
Page 14 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
imposed under KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and the limited liability entity tax
imposed under KRS 141.0401 on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or
Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising
from the economic development project, as set forth in KRS 141.415 and
154.32-070. Tax credits under this section shall be calculated under Section
1 of this Act;
(b) Authorization for the approved company to impose a wage assessment against
the gross wages of each new employee subject to the Kentucky income tax as
provided in KRS 154.32-090; and
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any economic
development project with an eligible investment of more than two hundred
million dollars ($200,000,000), the authority may authorize approval to the
economic development project based upon terms and incentives applicable to
economic development project locating in an enhanced incentive county.
(4) The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that the authority granted in this
subchapter and the purposes accomplished hereby are proper governmental and
public purposes for which public moneys may be expended, and that the
inducement of the location of economic development projects within the
Commonwealth is of paramount importance to the economic well-being of the
Commonwealth.
Section 4. KRS 154.32-040 is amended to read as follows:
The authority, upon final approval of a company, may enter into a tax incentive
agreement with the approved company. The terms and conditions of the tax incentive
agreement shall be negotiated between the authority and the approved company. The
terms of the tax incentive agreement shall include but not be limited to the following
provisions:
(1) The maximum approved costs that may be recovered over the term of the tax
Page 15 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
incentive agreement and the annual maximum for approved costs;
(2) That the approved company shall provide the authority with all documentation
requested in a manner acceptable to the authority;
(3) Identification of the contribution of the local government to the economic
development project, if any;
(4) The activation date, which shall be within two (2) years of final approval;
(5) That the approved company shall implement the activation date by notifying the
authority;
(6) That the approved company shall provide documentation satisfactory to the
authority within the timeframes required by the authority that it has met the
minimum employment, minimum investment, and minimum wage requirements,
including employee benefits, established by KRS 154.32-020;
(7) That failure of the approved company to meet any of the minimum job, minimum
investment, or minimum wage requirements, including employee benefits,
established by KRS 154.32-020, on the activation date shall result in cancellation of
the tax incentive agreement;
(8) The term of the agreement, which shall not exceed fifteen (15) years for an
economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10)
years for an economic development project located in a Tier I or Tier II[another]
county;
(9) That, if confirmed approved costs are less than the maximum approved costs
included in the tax incentive agreement, the confirmed approved costs shall become
the maximum amount that may be recovered by the approved company;
(10) If the economic development project is a leased project, that future rent payments
that are included in eligible costs shall be included as confirmed approved costs
upon submission of a valid lease agreement executed after preliminary approval;
(11) Establishment of a job target and minimum wage target, including employee
Page 16 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
benefits;
(12) A requirement that the job target and minimum wage target, including employee
benefits, be measured:
(a) On the activation date, against the actual new full-time jobs created and the
average wages, including employee benefits, paid for those jobs; and
(b) Annually during each year of the agreement, against the annual average of the
new full-time jobs and the average wages paid for those jobs, including
employee benefits;
(13) A provision requiring the approved company to notify the authority immediately if
the approved company sells or otherwise transfers or disposes of the land on which
an economic development project is located, if a lease relating to the economic
development project is terminated or lapses, or if the approved company ceases or
fundamentally alters operations at the economic development project;
(14) A provision detailing the reductions in incentives that will occur pursuant to KRS
154.32-030(4) if an approved company fails to meet its job target or minimum wage
target, including employee benefits;
(15) That the agreement may be assigned by the approved company upon the adoption
of a resolution by the authority to that effect;
(16) That the approved company shall make available to the authority all of its records
pertaining to the economic development project, including but not limited to payroll
records, records relating to eligible costs, and any other records pertaining to the
economic development project that the authority may require;
(17) That the authority may share information with the department for the purposes of
monitoring and enforcing the terms of the tax incentive agreement;
(18) That, if an approved company fails to comply with its obligations under the tax
incentive agreement other than the jobs target or minimum wage target, the
authority may take any or all of the following actions:
Page 17 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(a) Suspend the incentives available to the approved company;
(b) Terminate the incentives available to the approved company; or
(c) Pursue any other remedy set forth in the tax incentive agreement or to which it
may be entitled by law; and
(19) Any other provisions not inconsistent with this subchapter and determined to be
necessary or appropriate by the parties to the tax incentive agreement.
Section 5. KRS 154.32-050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall identify and certify or decertify the tiers for all[enhanced
incentive] counties on an annual basis as provided in this section. The authority
shall certify all counties in Kentucky into four (4) tax credit tiers. The incentives
available under this subchapter shall be determined based on the county where
the economic development project is located by an approved company.
(2) Each fiscal year, the authority shall:
(a) Obtain from the Department of Workforce Development in the Education and
Labor Cabinet, the final unemployment figures for the prior calendar year for
each county and for the Commonwealth as a whole; and
(b) For each county, identify[ those counties which have had]:
1. a. A countywide unemployment rate that exceeds the statewide
unemployment rate in the most recent five (5) consecutive
calendar years; or
b.[2.] An average countywide rate of unemployment exceeding the
statewide unemployment rate by two hundred percent (200%) in
the most recent calendar year; and
2. The county population ranking pursuant to KRS 154.21-017[
(c) Certify the counties identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection as enhanced
incentive counties].
(3) On or before January 1, 2027, and no later than January 1 annually thereafter,
Page 18 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
the authority shall determine a county's tax credit tier based on the five (5) year
average of:
(a) A county's unemployment rate; and
(b) A county's population ranking pursuant to KRS 154.21-017.
The tier rankings shall be effective July 1, 2027, and no later than July 1
annually thereafter.
(4) The cabinet shall publish tax credit tiers approved under this section annually on
January 1 as follows:
(a) Tier I shall be the top twenty (20) counties with the highest composite score
as calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Tier II shall be the next twenty (20) counties after Tier I with the highest
composite score as calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Tier III shall be the next forty (40) counties after Tier II with the highest
composite score as calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and
(d) Tier IV shall be the next forty (40) counties after Tier III with the highest
composite score as calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section[A
county not certified under subsection (2) of this section may also be certified
by the authority as an enhanced incentive county if the authority determines
the county is one (1) of the sixty (60) most distressed counties in the
Commonwealth based on the following criteria with equal weight given to
each criterion:
(a) The average countywide rate of unemployment in the most recent three (3)
consecutive calendar years, using the information obtained under subsection
(2)(a) of this section;
(b) The percentage of adults twenty-five (25) years of age and older who have
attained at least a high school education or equivalent, on the basis of the most
recent data available from the United States Department of Commerce,
Page 19 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
Bureau of the Census; and
(c) The quality of the roads in the county. Quality of roads shall be determined by
the access within a county to roads, ranked in descending order from best
quality to worst quality, as certified to the authority by the Kentucky
Transportation Cabinet as follows:
1. Two (2) or more interstate highways;
2. One (1) interstate highway;
3. A state four (4) lane parkway;
4. A four (4) lane principal arterial access to an interstate highway;
5. A state two (2) lane parkway; and
6. None of the preceding road types].
(5)[(4)] (a) If the authority determines that an enhanced incentive county no longer
meets the criteria to be certified as an enhanced incentive county under this
section, the authority shall decertify that county.
(b) Any economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county
that was decertified by the authority after May 1, 2009, shall have until July 1
of the third year following the fiscal year in which the county was decertified
to obtain final approval from the authority.
(6)[(5)] (a) As used in this subsection, "industrial park" means a regional industrial
park as defined in KRS 42.4588, or an industrial park created pursuant to an
interlocal agreement in which revenues are shared as provided in KRS 65.210
to 65.300.
(b) An economic development project undertaken in an industrial park that is
located in two (2) or more counties, one (1) of which is an enhanced incentive
county, may be approved for the enhanced incentive county incentives set
forth in this subchapter.
(7)[(6)] On or before July 1, 2028, and no later than July 1 every two (2) years
Page 20 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
thereafter, the cabinet shall report to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue the
following information for each county:
(a) The county name;
(b) The tier ranking for that county;
(c) The five (5) year average unemployment rate; and
(d) The five (5) year average county population ranking[A county not certified
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section may be certified by the authority as
an enhanced incentive county if the county has been declared a disaster relief
area by any state or federal agency on or after December 1, 2021. The
enhanced county certification shall be effective for a period of two (2) years
from the date of certification by the authority. Following the two (2) year
period, if a county certified under this subsection does not meet the criteria
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section to be certified as an enhanced
incentive county, the county shall be decertified in accordance with
subsection (4) of this section].
Section 6. KRS 154.32-090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An approved company or, with the authority's consent, an affiliate of an approved
company may impose wage assessments against employees as provided in this
section if a wage assessment is included in the incentives awarded to the approved
company in the tax incentive agreement. The level of wage assessment shall be
negotiated as part of the tax incentive agreement.
(2) If an economic development project is located in an enhanced incentive county, the
approved company or, with the authority's consent, an affiliate of the approved
company may require that each employee subject to the tax imposed by KRS
141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a result of the
economic development project, as a condition of employment, agree to an
Page 21 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
assessment of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the individual income tax rate
imposed by KRS 141.020, and that assessment shall operate as the
Commonwealth's wage assessment. Although not required for an economic
development project located in an enhanced incentive county, a local jurisdiction
may agree to forgo all or a portion of its local occupational license fee as a local
wage assessment.
(3) (a) If the economic development project is located in a Tier I or Tier II[not
located in an enhanced incentive] county, and is located in a local jurisdiction
where:
1. No local occupational license fee is imposed;
2. a. A local occupational license fee greater than or equal to twenty
percent (20%) of the individual income tax rate in KRS 141.020 is
imposed; and
b. The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo, as the local wage
assessment, at least twenty percent (20%) of the individual income
tax rate imposed by KRS 141.020 via credits against the local
occupational license fee for the affected employees; or
3. a. A local occupational license fee less than twenty percent (20%) of
the individual income tax rate in KRS 141.020 is imposed; and
b. The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo the total amount of the local
occupational license fee as the local wage assessment; then
(b) An approved company or, with the authority's consent, an affiliate of an
approved company may require that each employee subject to tax imposed by
KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a
result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment,
agree to pay an assessment of up to sixty percent (60%) of the individual
income tax rate imposed by KRS 141.020 and that assessment shall operate as
Page 22 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
the Commonwealth's wage assessment.
(4) (a) If the economic development project is located in a Tier I or Tier II [not
located in an enhanced incentive] county, and is located in a local jurisdiction
where:
1. a. A local occupational license fee greater than or equal to twenty
percent (20%) of the individual income tax rate in KRS 141.020 is
imposed; and
b. The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo an amount of the local
occupational license fee that is less than twenty percent (20%) of
the individual income tax rate in KRS 141.020 as the local wage
assessment; or
2. a. A local occupational license fee of lesser than twenty percent
(20%) of the individual income tax rate in KRS 141.020 is
imposed; and
b. The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo only a portion of the total
amount of the local occupational license fee as the local wage
assessment; then
(b) An approved company or, with the authority's consent, an affiliate of an
approved company may require that each employee subject to tax imposed by
KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a
result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment,
agree to pay an assessment equal to three (3) times the forgone local wage
assessment rate and that assessment shall operate as the Commonwealth's
wage assessment.
(5) If the project is not located in an enhanced incentive county, and:
(a) Is located in a local jurisdiction that does not impose a local occupational
license fee, the local jurisdiction shall be required to provide some alternative
Page 23 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
inducement satisfactory to the authority at the local level in order for a
preliminarily approved company to receive final approval. However, the
authority may waive this requirement if there are reasonable circumstances
that prevent the local jurisdiction from providing a reasonable inducement; or
(b) Is located in a local jurisdiction that does impose a local occupational license
fee, the jurisdiction may request that the authority waive the local
occupational license fee requirements established by subsection (3) or (4) of
this section if the local jurisdiction offers alternative inducements of similar
value satisfactory to the authority. The authority shall review all requests for a
waiver, and may waive the local occupational license fee requirements and
instead require the local jurisdiction to provide alternative inducements of
similar value if the authority determines that the circumstances warrant an
alternative contribution by the local jurisdiction.
(6) Each employee paying the assessment shall simultaneously be entitled to a credit
against the Kentucky individual income tax required to be withheld under KRS
141.310 equal to the state portion of the assessment and shall be entitled to a credit
against the local occupational license tax equal to the local portion of the
assessment.
(7) If more than one (1) local jurisdiction imposes an occupational license fee, the local
jurisdiction portion of the assessment shall be prorated proportionately among the
taxes imposed by the local jurisdictions unless one (1) local jurisdiction agrees to
forgo the receipt of these taxes in an amount equal to the local jurisdiction portion
of the wage assessment, in which case no proration shall be made.
(8) If a full-time employee subject to state tax imposed by KRS 141.020 is already
employed by the approved company at a site other than the site of the economic
development project, that full-time employee's job shall be deemed to have been
created when the full-time employee is transferred to the site of the economic
Page 24 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
development project if the full-time employee's existing job is filled with a new
full-time employee.
(9) If an approved company elects to impose the assessment as a condition of
employment, it shall be authorized to deduct the assessment from each payment of
wages to the employee.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, if an
approved company elects not to deduct the assessment from each payment of wages
to the employee, but rather requests a reimbursement of state tax imposed by KRS
141.020 or local occupational tax in the aggregate after they have been paid to the
state or local jurisdiction, no interest shall be paid by the state or by the local
jurisdiction on that reimbursement.
(11) No credit, or portion thereof, shall be allowed against any occupational license fee
imposed by or dedicated solely to the board of education in a local jurisdiction.
(12) An approved company imposing an assessment shall make its payroll, books, and
records available to the authority or the department upon request, and shall file with
the authority or department documentation pertaining to the assessment as the
authority or department may require.
(13) Any assessment of the wages of employees of an approved company in connection
with their employment at an economic development project shall permanently cease
at the expiration of the tax incentive agreement.
Section 7. KRS 154.61-010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Above-the-line production crew" means employees involved with the production
of a motion picture or entertainment production whose salaries are negotiated prior
to commencement of production, such as actors, directors, producers, and writers;
(2) "Animated production" means a nationally distributed feature-length film created
with the rapid display of a sequence of images using 2-D or 3-D graphics of
Page 25 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
artwork or model positions in order to create an illusion of movement;
(3) "Approved company" means an eligible company approved for incentives provided
under KRS 141.383 and 154.61-020;
(4) "Below-the-line production crew" means employees involved with the production
of a motion picture or entertainment production except above-the-line production
crew. "Below-the-line production crew" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Casting assistants;
(b) Costume design;
(c) Extras;
(d) Gaffers;
(e) Grips;
(f) Location managers;
(g) Production assistants;
(h) Set construction staff; and
(i) Set design staff;
(5) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(6) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(7) "Compensation" means compensation included in adjusted gross income as defined
in KRS 141.010;
(8) "Continuous film production" means a motion picture or entertainment production
that:
(a) 1. Has a projected budget of a minimum of ten million dollars
($10,000,000) per calendar year for qualifying expenditures and
qualifying payroll expenditures allocated to all qualifying motion picture
or entertainment productions to be filmed or produced in Kentucky, with
a minimum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000)
per production in Kentucky; and
Page 26 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
2. Has a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of the funds available and the
ability to raise the remaining funds necessary to complete the filming
and production, which may be verified by:
a. Bank statements or other financial documents; or
b. A fundraising plan at the request of the council;
(b) Demonstrates a distribution contract for each motion or entertainment
production;
(c) Films and produces a minimum of twelve (12) or more days per production
within the Commonwealth; and
(d) Maintains:
1. An apprenticeship program or on-the-job training program as defined in
KRS 343.010; or
2. Partners with a film studies program with an accredited institution of
postsecondary education located in the Commonwealth;
(9) "Council" means the Kentucky Film Leadership Council created in KRS 154.12-
282;
(10) "Documentary" means a production based upon factual information and not
subjective interjections;
(11) "Eligible company" means any person that intends to film or produce a motion
picture or entertainment production in the Commonwealth;
(12) "Employee" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010, and, for purposes of this
subchapter, also may include the employees or independent contractors of an
approved company or the employees of a loan-out entity engaged by an approved
company if they meet the requirements of KRS 141.310;
(13) "Enhanced incentive county" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;
(14) "Feature-length film" means a live-action or animated production that is:
(a) More than thirty (30) minutes in length; and
Page 27 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(b) Produced for distribution in theaters or via digital format, including but not
limited to DVD, Internet, or mobile electronic devices;
(15) "Industrial film" means a business-to-business film that may be viewed by the
public, including but not limited to videos used for training or for viewing at a trade
show;
(16) "Kentucky-based company" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011;
(17) "Loan-out entity" means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or
other entity through which an artist or other person is loaned out to perform services
for the approved company. A loan-out entity shall be registered and in good
standing with the Kentucky Secretary of State. Notwithstanding the business
organization, the loan-out entity and all employees of and other persons performing
services for the loan-out entity shall be subject to all applicable provisions of the
Kentucky personal income tax and any applicable payroll or other tax provisions;
(18) (a) "Motion picture or entertainment production" means:
1. The following if filmed in whole or in part, or produced in whole or in
part, in the Commonwealth:
a. A feature-length film;
b. A television program;
c. An industrial film; or
d. A documentary; or
2. A national touring production of a Broadway show produced in
Kentucky.
(b) "Motion picture or entertainment production" does not include the filming or
production of obscene material or television coverage of news or athletic
events;
(19) "Obscene" has the same meaning as in KRS 531.010;
(20) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010;
Page 28 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(21) (a) "Qualifying expenditure" means expenditures made in the Commonwealth for
the following if directly used in or for a motion picture or entertainment
production:
1. The production script and synopsis;
2. Set construction and operations, wardrobe, accessories, and related
services;
3. Lease or rental of real property in Kentucky as a set location;
4. Photography, sound synchronization, lighting, and related services;
5. Editing and related services;
6. Rental of facilities and equipment;
7. Vehicle leases;
8. Food; and
9. Accommodations.
(b) "Qualifying expenditure" does not include Kentucky sales and use tax paid by
the approved company on the qualifying expenditure;
(22) "Qualifying payroll expenditure" means compensation paid to above-the-line crew
and below-the line crew while working on a motion picture or entertainment
production in the Commonwealth if the compensation is for services performed in
the Commonwealth;
(23) "Resident" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010;
(24) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(25) "Tax incentive agreement" means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS
154.61-030 between the council and the approved company;[ and]
(26) "Television program" means any live-action or animated production or
documentary, including but not limited to:
(a) An episodic series;
(b) A miniseries;
Page 29 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(c) A television movie; or
(d) A television pilot;
that is produced for distribution on television via broadcast, cable, or any digital
format, including but not limited to cable, satellite, internet, or mobile electronic
devices; and
(27) "Tier" means the sorting of all Kentucky counties into quartiles based on each
county's unemployment rate and population ranking pursuant to Section 5 of this
Act.
Section 8. KRS 154.61-020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purposes of KRS 141.383 and this subchapter are to encourage:
(a) The film and entertainment industry to choose locations in the
Commonwealth for the filming and production of motion picture or
entertainment productions;
(b) The development of a film and entertainment industry in Kentucky;
(c) Increased employment opportunities for the citizens of the Commonwealth
within the film and entertainment industry; and
(d) The development of a production and postproduction infrastructure in the
Commonwealth for film production and touring Broadway show production
facilities containing state-of-the-art technologies.
(2) The council, together with the Department of Revenue, shall administer the tax
credit established by KRS 141.383, this section, and KRS 154.61-030.
(3) To qualify for the tax incentive provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
following requirements shall be met:
(a) For an approved company that is also a Kentucky-based company that:
1. Films or produces a feature-length film, television program, or industrial
film in whole or in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined
total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures
Page 30 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
shall be one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000);
2. Produces a national touring production of a Broadway show in whole or
in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined total of
qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); or
3. Films or produces a documentary in whole or in part in the
Commonwealth, the minimum combined total of qualifying
expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be ten thousand
dollars ($10,000); and
(b) For an approved company that is not a Kentucky-based company that:
1. Films or produces a feature-length film, television program, or industrial
film in whole or in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined
total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures
shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); or
2. Films or produces a documentary in whole or in part in the
Commonwealth or that produces a national touring production of a
Broadway show, the minimum combined total of qualifying
expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be twenty
thousand dollars ($20,000).
(4) (a) Beginning on January 1, 2022, the total tax incentive approved under KRS
141.383 and this subchapter shall be limited to seventy-five million dollars
($75,000,000) for calendar year 2022 and each calendar year thereafter.
(b) Beginning with calendar year 2024:
1. Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be allocated for all
approved companies with a continuous film production; and
2. On the first day of July of each calendar year, any unused balance of the
amount allocated under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph for continuous
Page 31 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
film productions shall be made available for all approved companies
with motion picture or entertainment productions.
(5) (a) To qualify for the tax incentive available under KRS 141.383 and this
subchapter all applicants shall:
1. Begin filming or production in Kentucky within six (6) months of
approval by the council; and
2. Complete filming or production in Kentucky within two (2) years of the
filming or production start date.
(b) The tax credit shall be against the Kentucky income tax imposed under KRS
141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS
141.0401, and shall be refundable as provided in KRS 141.383.
(c) 1. For a motion picture or entertainment production or continuous film
production filmed or produced in its entirety in an enhanced incentive
county, the amount of the incentive shall be equal to thirty-five percent
(35%) of the approved company's:
a. Qualifying expenditures;
b. Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident and nonresident
below-the-line production crew; and
c. Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident and nonresident
above-the-line production crew not to exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000) in payroll expenditures per employee.
2. a. To the extent the approved company films or produces a motion
picture or entertainment production or continuous film production
in part in an enhanced incentive county and in part a Tier I or Tier
II Kentucky county[ that is not an enhanced incentive county], the
approved company shall be eligible to receive the incentives
provided in this paragraph for those expenditures incurred in the
Page 32 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
enhanced incentive county and all other expenditures shall be
subject to the incentives provided in paragraph (d) of this
subsection.
b. The approved company shall track the requisite expenditures by
county. If the approved company can demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the cabinet that it is not practical to use a separate
accounting method to determine the expenditures by county, the
approved company shall determine the correct expenditures by
county using an alternative method approved by the cabinet.
(d) For a motion picture or entertainment production or continuous film
production filmed or produced in whole or in part in any Tier I or Tier II
Kentucky county[ other than in an enhanced incentive county], the amount of
the incentive shall be equal to:
1. Thirty percent (30%) of the approved company's:
a. Qualifying expenditures;
b. Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to below-the-line production
crew that are not residents; and
c. Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to above-the-line production
crew that are not residents, not to exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000) in payroll expenditures per employee; and
2. Thirty-five percent (35%) of the approved company's:
a. Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident below-the-line
production crew; and
b. Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident above-the-line
production crew not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in
payroll expenditures per employee.
Section 9. KRS 141.383 is amended to read as follows:
Page 33 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Above-the-line production crew" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-
010;
(b) "Approved company" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(c) "Below-the-line production crew" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-
010;
(d) "Continuous film production" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(e) "Council" means the Kentucky Film Leadership Council created in KRS
154.12-282;
(f) "Loan-out entity" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(g) "Qualifying expenditure" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(h) "Qualifying payroll expenditure" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-
010;
(i) "Secretary" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010; and
(j) "Tax incentive agreement" has the same meaning as KRS 154.61-010.
(2) (a) There is hereby created a tax credit against the tax imposed under KRS
141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401, with the ordering of credits as provided in
KRS 141.0205.
(b) The incentive available under paragraph (a) of this section is:
1. A refundable credit for applications approved prior to April 27, 2018;
2. A nonrefundable and nontransferable credit for applications approved on
or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022; and
3. A refundable credit for applications approved on or after January 1,
2022, if the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection are met.
(c) 1. The total tax incentive approved under KRS 154.61-020 shall be limited
to:
a. One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for calendar year
Page 34 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
2018 and each calendar year through the calendar year 2021;
b. Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for the calendar year
2022 and each calendar year thereafter; and
c. Beginning with calendar year 2024, the amount in subdivision b.
of this subparagraph shall be allocated accordingly:
i. Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be allocated
for all approved companies with a continuous film
production; and
ii. On the first day of April 2025, and on April 1 of each
calendar year thereafter, any unused balance allocated under
subpart i. of this subdivision for continuous film productions
shall be made available for all approved companies with a
motion picture or entertainment production.
2. To qualify for the refundable credit, all applicants shall:
a. Begin filming or production in Kentucky within six (6) months of
approval by the council; and
b. Complete filming or production in Kentucky within two (2) years
of their production start date.
(3) An approved company may receive a refundable tax credit if:
(a) The department has received notification from the council that the approved
company has satisfied all requirements of KRS 154.61-020 and 154.61-030;
and
(b) The approved company has provided a detailed cost report and sufficient
documentation to the council, which has been forwarded by the council to the
department, that:
1. The purchases of qualifying expenditures were made after the execution
of the tax incentive agreement; and
Page 35 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
2. The approved company or loan-out entity has withheld income tax as
required by KRS 141.310 on all qualified payroll expenditures, and
remitted and certified the withheld amount to the department.
(4) Interest shall not be allowed or paid on any refundable credits provided under this
section.
(5) The department may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter
13A to administer this section.
(6) On or before September 1, 2010, and on or before each September 1 thereafter, for
the immediately preceding fiscal year, the department shall report to the council and
the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue the names of the
approved companies and the amounts of refundable income tax credit claimed.
(7) No later than September 1, 2021, and by November 1 every four (4) years
thereafter, the department and the Cabinet for Economic Development shall
cooperatively provide historical data related to the tax credit allowed in this section
and KRS 154.61-020 and 154.61-030, including data items beginning with tax
credits claimed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018:
(a) The name of the taxpayer claiming the tax credit;
(b) The date that the application was approved and the date the filming or
production was completed;
(c) The taxable year in which the taxpayer claimed the tax credit;
(d) The total amount of the tax credit, including any amount denied, any amount
applied against a tax liability, any amount refunded, and any amount
remaining that may be claimed on a return filed in the future;
(e) Whether the taxpayer is a Kentucky-based company as defined in KRS
154.61-010;
(f) Whether the taxpayer films or produces a:
1. Feature-length film, television program, or industrial film;
Page 36 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2255
2. National touring production of a Broadway show; or
3. Documentary;
(g) Whether the filming or production was performed:
1. Entirely in an enhanced county; or
2. In whole or in part in any Tier I or Tier II Kentucky county[ other than
in an enhanced incentive county];
(h) The amount of qualifying expenditures incurred by the taxpayer;
(i) The amount of qualifying payroll expenditures paid to:
1. Resident below-the-line crew; and
2. Nonresident below-the-line production crew;
including the number of crew members in each category;
(j) The amount of qualifying payroll expenditures paid to:
1. Resident above-the-line crew; and
2. Nonresident above-the-line crew;
including the number of crew members in each category; and
(k) A brief description of the type of motion picture or entertainment production
project.
(8) The information required to be reported under this section shall not be considered
confidential taxpayer information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or
any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or
reporting of information.
Page 37 of 37
XXXX 2/19/2026 5:38 PM Jacketed